Utah statutes.
63H-5-104.   Member or employee -- Disclosure of interest.

(1)  A member or employee of the authority who has, will have, or later acquires an interest, direct or indirect, in a transaction with the authority shall immediately disclose the nature and extent of that interest in writing to the authority as soon as the individual has knowledge of the actual or prospective interest.

(2)  The disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority.

(3)  After making the disclosure, the member or employee may participate in any action by the authority authorizing the transaction.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

